District of Columbia statutes.
22-2603.03

Penalties.

(a)

A person convicted of violating this subchapter with regard to Class A contraband shall be imprisoned for not more than 10 years, fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, or both.

(b)

A person convicted of violating this subchapter with regard to Class B contraband shall be imprisoned for not more than 2 years, fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, or both.

(c)

A person convicted of violating § 22-2603.02(c) shall be imprisoned for not more than 1 year, fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, or both.

(d)

Any term of imprisonment imposed on an inmate or prisoner pursuant to this section shall be:

(1)

Consecutive to the term of imprisonment being served at the time this offense was committed; or

(2)

If the inmate was confined pending trial or sentencing, consecutive to any term of imprisonment imposed in the case in which the inmate was being detained at the time this offense was committed.

(e)

The violation of this subchapter with regard to Class C contraband shall be an administrative penalty prescribed by the Department of Corrections or the Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services.

Dec. 15, 1941, 55 Stat. 800, ch. 572, § 1
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 572, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(c)(30)
redesignated § 4, Dec. 10, 2009, D.C. Law 18-88, § 210, 56 DCR 7413
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 227, 60 DCR 2064

History

2001 Ed., § 22-2603.
1981 Ed., § 22-2603.
1973 Ed., § 22-2603.

Prior Codifications

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $10,000” in (a), for “not more than $2,000” in (b), and for “not more than $1,000” in (c).

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 210 of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-181, August 6, 2009, 56 DCR 6903).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 210 of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-227, October 21, 2009, 56 DCR 8668).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 227 of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Emergency Legislation

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.

Editor's Notes